Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.070

Liability of director.

The director and individuals acting on the director's behalf shall not be civilly liable for any act performed in good faith in the course of their duties.

[ 1995 c 269 s 503; 1995 c 27 s 7; 1989 c 382 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 27 s 7 and by 1995 c 269 s 503, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.